North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 13. Transfer of Convicted Foreign Citizens Under Federal Treaty.

§ 148-122.
Transfer of convicted foreign citizens under treaty; consent by Governor. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

If a treaty in effect between the United States and a foreign country provides for the transfer or exchange of convicted offenders to the country of which the offenders are citizens or nationals, the Governor may, on behalf of the State and subject to the terms of the treaty, authorize the Secretary of Public Safety to consent to the transfer or exchange of offenders and take any other action necessary to initiate the participation of the State in the treaty.

History.

2002-166, s. 4; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i).

§ 148-122.
Transfer of convicted foreign citizens under treaty; consent by Governor. [Effective January 1, 2023]

If a treaty in effect between the United States and a foreign country provides for the transfer or exchange of convicted offenders to the country of which the offenders are citizens or nationals, the Governor may, on behalf of the State and subject to the terms of the treaty, authorize the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction to consent to the transfer or exchange of offenders and take any other action necessary to initiate the participation of the State in the treaty.

History.

2002-166, s. 4; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o).

§§ 148-123 through 148-127.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

History.

2007-280, s. 1.